California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) For purposes of care coordination and to schedule a followup appointment, the health plan, mental health plan, primary care provider, or other appropriate provider to whom the person has been referred pursuant to subdivision (c) shall make a good faith effort to contact the referred individual no fewer than three times, either by email, telephone, mail, or in-person outreach, whichever method or methods is most likely to reach the individual.

(e) A person designated by the mental health facility shall give to
 any person who has been detained at that facility for evaluation and treatment and who is receiving medication as a result of their mental illness, as soon as possible after detention, written and oral information about the probable effects and possible side effects of the medication. The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop and promulgate written materials on the effects of medications, for use by county mental health programs as disseminated or as modified by the county mental health program, addressing the probable effects and the possible side effects of the medication. The following information shall be given orally to the patient:

(1) The nature of the mental illness, or behavior, that is the reason the medication is being given or recommended.

(2) The
 likelihood of improving or not improving without the medication.

(3) Reasonable alternative treatments available.

(4) (A) The name and type, frequency, amount, and method of dispensing the medication, and the probable length of time the medication will be taken.

(B) The fact that the information has or has not been given shall be indicated in the patient’s chart. If the information has not been given, the designated person shall document in the patient’s chart the justification for not providing the information. A failure to give information about the probable effects and possible side effects of the medication shall not constitute new grounds for release.

(f) The amendments to this section made by Assembly Bill 348 of the 2003–04 Regular Session shall not be construed to revise or expand the scope of practice of psychologists, as defined in Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.   (AB 2242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.1.

The professional person in charge of the facility providing 72-hour evaluation and treatment, or his or her designee, shall notify the county behavioral health director or the director’s designee and the peace officer who makes the written application pursuant to Section 5150 or a person who is designated by the law enforcement agency that employs the peace officer, when the person has been released after 72-hour detention, when the person is not detained, or when the person is released before the full period of allowable 72-hour detention if all of the following conditions apply:

(a) The peace officer requests such notification at the time he or she makes the application and the peace officer certifies
 at that time in writing that the person has been referred to the facility under circumstances which, based upon an allegation of facts regarding actions witnessed by the officer or another person, would support the filing of a criminal complaint.

(b) The notice is limited to the person’s name, address, date of admission for 72-hour evaluation and treatment, and date of release.

If a police officer, law enforcement agency, or designee of the law enforcement agency, possesses any record of information obtained pursuant to the notification requirements of this section, the officer, agency, or designee shall destroy that record two years after receipt of notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 19.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.2.

Each law enforcement agency within a county shall arrange with the county behavioral health director a method for giving prompt notification to peace officers pursuant to Section 5152.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 20.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5153.

Whenever possible, officers charged with apprehension of persons pursuant to this article shall dress in plain clothes and travel in unmarked vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 722.)
-------------------------------------------

5154.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5113, if the provisions of Section 5152 have been met, the professional person in charge of the facility providing 72-hour treatment and evaluation, their designee, the medical director of the facility or their designee described in Section 5152, the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment, or the psychologist shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released before the end of 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(b) The professional person in charge of the facility providing 72-hour treatment and evaluation, their designee, the medical director of the facility or their designee described in Section 5152, the psychiatrist directly responsible for
 the person’s treatment, or the psychologist shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at the end of the 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(c) The peace officer responsible for the detainment of the person shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at or before the end of the 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(d) A member of a mobile crisis team or a professional person who has been designated by the county pursuant to Section 5121 and who detains or transports a person pursuant to Section 5150 shall not, as a result of detaining or transporting the person, be civilly or criminally liable for any action by the person if the person is released at or before the end of the 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(e) The amendments to this section
 made by Assembly Bill 348 of the 2003–04 Regular Session shall not be construed to revise or expand the scope of practice of psychologists, as defined in Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 399, Sec. 2.   (AB 1443)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5155.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as granting authority to local entities to issue licenses supplementary to existing state and local licensing laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Detention of Individuals Under the Influence of Alcohol for Evaluation and Treatment [5170. - 5176.]

5170.

When any person is a danger to others, or to himself, or gravely disabled as a result of inebriation, a peace officer, member of the attending staff, as defined by regulation, of an evaluation facility designated by the county, or other person designated by the county may, upon reasonable cause, take, or cause to be taken, the person into civil protective custody and place him in a facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Abuse as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation of inebriates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

5170.1.

A 72-hour treatment and evaluation facility shall include one or more of the following:

(1) A screening, evaluation, and referral facility which may be accomplished by a mobile crisis unit, first aid station or ambulatory detoxification unit;

(2) A detoxification facility for alcoholic and acutely intoxicated persons. 

(3) An alcohol recovery house.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------

5170.3.

Such evaluation facility shall require an application in writing stating the circumstances under which the person’s condition was called to the attention of the officer, member of the attending staff, or other designated person, and stating that the officer, member of the attending staff, or other designated person believes as a result of his personal observations that the person is, as a result of inebriation, a danger to others, or to himself, or gravely disabled or has violated subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1581.)
-------------------------------------------

5170.5.

Any person placed in an evaluation facility has, immediately after he is taken to an evaluation facility and except where physically impossible, no later than three hours after he is placed in such facility or taken to such unit, the right to make, at his own expense, at least two completed telephone calls. If the person placed in the evaluation facility does not have money upon him with which to make such calls, he shall be allowed free at least two completed local toll free or collect telephone calls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------

5170.7.

A person who requests to be released from the facility before 72 hours have elapsed shall be released only if the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment believes, as a result of his or her personal observations, that the person is not a danger to others, or to himself or herself. If any other professional person who is authorized to release the person, believes the person should be released before 72 hours have elapsed, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment objects, the matter shall be referred to the medical director of the facility for the final decision. However, if the
 medical director is not a psychiatrist, he or she shall appoint a designee who is a psychiatrist. If the matter is referred, the person shall be released before 72 hours have elapsed only if the psychiatrist making the final decision believes, as a result of his or her personal observations, that the person is not a danger to others, or to himself or herself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1288, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5171.

(a) If the facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation of individuals under the influence of alcohol admits the person, it may detain the individual for evaluation and detoxification treatment, and such other treatment as may be indicated, for a period not to exceed 72 hours. Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays shall be included for the purpose of calculating the 72-hour period. However, an individual may voluntarily remain in the facility for more than 72 hours if the professional person in charge of the facility determines the individual is in need of and may benefit from further treatment and care, provided any individual who is taken or caused to be taken to the facility shall have priority for
 available treatment and care over an individual who has voluntarily remained in a facility for more than 72 hours.

(b) If in the judgment of the professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and treatment, the person can be properly served without being detained, the individual shall be provided evaluation, detoxification treatment or other treatment, crisis intervention, or other inpatient or outpatient services on a voluntary basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 847, Sec. 88.   (AB 2995)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5172.

Each person admitted to a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation under the provisions of this article shall receive an evaluation as soon after he or she is admitted as possible and shall receive whatever treatment and care his or her condition requires for the full period that he or she is held. The person shall be released before 72 hours have elapsed only if, the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment believes, as a result of his or her personal observations, that the person no longer requires evaluation or treatment. If any other professional person who is authorized to release the person,
 believes the person should be released before 72 hours have elapsed, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment objects, the matter shall be referred to the medical director of the facility for the final decision. However, if the medical director is not a psychiatrist, he or she shall appoint a designee who is a psychiatrist. If the matter is referred, the person shall be released before 72 hours have elapsed only if the psychiatrist making the final decision believes, as a result of his or her personal observations, that the person no longer requires evaluation or treatment.

Persons who have been detained for evaluation and treatment shall be released, referred for further care and treatment on a voluntary basis, or, if the person, as a result of impairment by chronic alcoholism, is a danger to others or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled, he or she may be certified for intensive treatment, or a conservator or temporary conservator
 shall be appointed for him or her pursuant to this part as required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1288, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5172.1.

Any person who is a danger to others, or to himself, or gravely disabled as a result of inebriation, may voluntarily apply for admission to a 72-hour evaluation and detoxification treatment facility for inebriates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1581.)
-------------------------------------------

5173.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5113, if the provisions of Section 5170.7 or 5172 have been met, the professional person in charge of the facility providing 72-hour treatment and evaluation, the medical director of the facility or his or her designee described in Sections 5170.7 and 5172, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released before the end of 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(b) The professional person in charge of the facility
 providing 72-hour treatment and evaluation, the medical director of the facility or his or her designee described in Sections 5170.7 and 5172, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at the end of the 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(c) The peace officer responsible for the detainment of the person shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at or before the end of the 72 hours pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1288, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5174.

It is the intent of the Legislature (a) that facilities for 72-hour treatment and evaluation of inebriates be subject to state funding under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of this division only if they provide screening, evaluation and referral services and have available medical services in the facility or by referral agreement with an appropriate medical facility, and would normally be considered an integral part of a community health program; (b) that state reimbursement under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) for such 72-hour facilities and intensive treatment facilities, under this article shall not be included as priority funding as are reimbursements for
 other county expenditures under this part for involuntary treatment services, but may be provided on the basis of new and expanded services if funds for new and expanded services are available; that while facilities receiving funds from other sources may, if eligible for funding under this division, be designated as 72-hour facilities, or intensive treatment facilities for the purposes of this article, funding of such facilities under this division shall not be substituted for such previous funding.

No 72-hour facility, or intensive treatment facility for the purposes of this article shall be eligible for funding under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of this division until approved by the Director of Alcohol and Drug Abuse in accordance with standards established by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Abuse in regulations adopted pursuant to this part. To the maximum extent possible, each county shall utilize services provided for inebriates and persons
 impaired by chronic alcoholism by federal and other funds presently used for such services, including federal and other funds made available to the State Department of Rehabilitation and the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Abuse. McAteer funds shall not be utilized for the purposes of the 72-hour involuntary holding program as outlined in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

5175.

This article does not prevent a facility designated as a facility for 72-hour evaluation and treatment of individuals under the influence of alcohol from also being designated as a facility for 72-hour evaluation and treatment of other persons subject to this part, including persons impaired by chronic alcoholism.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 847, Sec. 89.   (AB 2995)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5176.

(a) This article shall apply only to those counties wherein the board of supervisors has adopted a resolution stating that suitable facilities exist within the county for the care and treatment of individuals under the influence of alcohol, including persons impaired by chronic alcoholism, designating the facilities to be used as facilities for 72-hour treatment and evaluation of individuals
 under the influence of alcohol and for the extensive treatment of persons impaired by chronic alcoholism, and otherwise adopting the provisions of this article.

(b) Each county Short-Doyle plan for a county to which this article is made applicable shall designate the specific facility or facilities for 72-hour evaluation and detoxification treatment of individuals under the influence of alcohol and for intensive treatment of persons impaired by chronic alcoholism and for the treatment of those persons on a voluntary basis under this article, and shall specify the maximum number of patients that can be served at any one time by each facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 847, Sec. 90.   (AB 2995)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Court-Ordered Evaluation for Persons with a Mental Health Condition [5200. - 5213.]

5200.

Any person alleged, as a result of mental disorder, to be a danger to others, or to himself, or to be gravely disabled, may be given an evaluation of his condition under a superior court order pursuant to this article. The provisions of this article shall be carried out with the utmost consideration for the privacy and dignity of the person for whom a court-ordered evaluation is requested.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5201.

Any individual may apply to the person or agency designated by the county for a petition alleging that there is in the county a person who is, as a result of mental disorder a danger to others, or to himself, or is gravely disabled, and requesting that an evaluation of the person’s condition be made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

The person or agency designated by the county shall prepare the petition and all other forms required in the proceeding, and shall be responsible for filing the petition. Before filing the petition, the person or agency designated by the county shall request the person or agency designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services to provide prepetition screening to determine whether there is probable cause to believe the allegations. The person or agency providing prepetition screening shall conduct a reasonable investigation of the allegations and make a reasonable effort to personally interview the subject of the petition. The screening shall also determine whether the person will agree voluntarily to receive crisis intervention services or an evaluation in his own home or
 in a facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services. Following prepetition screening, the person or agency designated by the county shall file the petition if satisfied that there is probable cause to believe that the person is, as a result of mental disorder, a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled, and that the person will not voluntarily receive evaluation or crisis intervention.

If the petition is filed, it shall be accompanied by a report containing the findings of the person or agency designated by the county to provide prepetition screening. The prepetition screening report submitted to the superior court shall be confidential and shall be subject to the provisions of Section 5328.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 34.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

Any individual who seeks a petition for court-ordered evaluation knowing that the person for whom the petition is sought is not, as a result of mental disorder, a danger to himself, or to others, or gravely disabled is guilty of a misdemeanor, and may be held liable in civil damages by the person against whom the petition was sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 722.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

The petition for a court-ordered evaluation shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner and his interest in the case.

(b) The name of the person alleged, as a result of mental disorder, to be a danger to others, or to himself, or to be gravely disabled, and, if known to the petitioner, the address, age, sex, marital status, and occupation of the person. 

(c) The facts upon which the allegations of the petition are based.

(d) The name of, as a respondent thereto, every person known or believed by the petitioner to be legally responsible for the care, support, and maintenance of the person alleged, as a result of mental disorder, to be a danger to others, or to himself, or to be gravely disabled, and the address of each such person, if known to the petitioner.

(e) Such other information as the court may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

The petition shall be in substantially the following form: In the Superior Court of the State of California
 for the County of _____The People of the State of
 California
 Concerning andRespondents

 No. _____
Petition for 
Evaluation ________, residing at _____ (tel. ____), being duly sworn, alleges: That there is now in the county, in the City or Town of _____, a person named _____, who resides at _____, and who is, as a result of mental disorder:(1) A danger to others.
(2) A danger to himself
 or herself.
(3) Gravely disabled as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code (Strike out all inapplicable classifications).That the person is ____ years of age; that __ the person is ____­(sex); and that __ the person is _____ (single, married, widowed, or divorced); and that _____ occupation is _____.That the facts upon which the allegations of the petition are based are as follows: That __ the person, at _____ in the county, on the _____ day of _____, 20__, That petitioner’s interest in the case is That the person responsible for the care, support, and maintenance of the person, and their relationship to the person are, so far as known to the petitioner, as follows: (Give names, addresses, and relationship of persons named as respondents)Wherefore, petitioner prays that evaluation be made to determine the condition of ____, alleged, as a result of mental disorder, to be a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or to be gravely disabled.PetitionerSubscribed and sworn to before me this ____ day of _____ 20__., Clerk of the CourtBy Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 325.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

Whenever it appears, by petition pursuant to this article, to the satisfaction of a judge of a superior court that a person is, as a result of mental disorder, a danger to others, or to himself, or gravely disabled, and the person has refused or failed to accept evaluation voluntarily, the judge shall issue an order notifying the person to submit to an evaluation at such time and place as designated by the judge. The order for an evaluation shall be served as provided in Section 5208 by a peace officer, counselor in mental health, or a court-appointed official. The person shall be permitted to remain in his home or other place of his choosing prior to the time of evaluation,
 and shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. If the person to receive evaluation so requests, the individual or individuals who accompany him may be present during the evaluation.

If the person refuses or fails to appear for evaluation after having been properly notified, a peace officer, counselor in mental health, or a court-appointed official shall take the person into custody and place him in a facility designated by the county as a facility for treatment and evaluation. The person shall be evaluated as promptly as possible, and shall in no event be detained longer than 72 hours under the court order, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays if treatment and evaluation services are not available on those days.

Persons who have been detained for evaluation shall be released,
 referred for care and treatment on a voluntary basis, certified for intensive treatment, or recommended for conservatorship pursuant to this part, as required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5207.

The order for evaluation shall be in substantially the following form:In the Superior Court of the State of California
 for the County of _____The People of the State of California
 Concerning andRespondents

 No. _____
Order 
for 
Evaluation
or DetentionThe People of the State of California to :(Peace officer, counselor in mental health, or
other official appointed by the court)The petition of ____ has been presented this day to me, a Judge of the Superior Court for the County of ____, State of California, from which it appears that there is now in this county, at ____, a person by the name of ____, who is, as a result of mental disorder, a danger to others, or to himself, or gravely disabled.

Now, therefore, you are directed to notify ____ to submit to an evaluation at ____ on the ____ day of ____, 19_, at __ o’clock __m.

____ shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor.

The individual or individuals who accompany ____ may be present during the evaluation if so requested by ____. 
*Provision for Detention for Evaluation
If the person fails or refuses to appear for evaluation when notified by order of this court, you are hereby directed to detain said ____ or cause him to be detained at ____ for a period no longer than 72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays if evaluation services are not available on those days, for the purposes of evaluation.

I hereby direct that a copy of this order together with a copy of the petition be delivered to said person and his representative, if any, at the time of his notification; and I further authorize the service of this order at any hour of the day or night.

Witness my hand, this ____ day of ____, 19_ Judge of the Superior Court
*This paragraph is applicable only if the person to be evaluated fails or refuses to appear for evaluation after having been properly notified. 
Return of Order
I hereby certify that I received the above order for the evaluation of ____ and on the ____ day of ____, 19_, personally served a copy of the
 order and of the petition on ____ and the professional person in charge of the ____, a facility for treatment and evaluation, or his designee.

Dated: ____, 19_. Signature and Title

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.

As promptly as possible, a copy of the petition and the order for evaluation shall be personally served on the person to be evaluated and the professional person in charge of the facility for treatment and evaluation named in the order, or his designee.

If the person to be evaluated fails to appear for an evaluation at the time designated in the order, the professional person in charge, or his designee, shall notify the person who served the order to have the person to be evaluated detained pursuant to the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5210.

At the time a person is taken into custody for evaluation, or within a reasonable time thereafter, unless a responsible relative or the guardian or conservator of the person is in possession of the person’s personal property, the person taking him into custody shall take reasonable precautions to preserve and safeguard the personal property in the possession of or on the premises occupied by the person. The person taking him into custody shall then furnish to the court a report generally describing the person’s property so preserved and safeguarded and its disposition, in substantially the form set forth in Section 5211; except that if a responsible relative or the guardian or
 conservator of the person is in possession of the person’s property, the report shall include only the name of the relative or guardian or conservator and the location of the property, whereupon responsibility of the person taking him into custody for such property shall terminate.

As used in this section, “responsible relative” includes the spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person, except that it does not include the person who applied for the petition under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5211.

The report of a patient’s property required by Section 5210 to be made by the person taking him into custody for evaluation shall be in substantially the following form: 
Report of Officer

I hereby report to the Superior Court for the County of _____ that the personal property of the person apprehended, described generally as ____ was preserved and safeguarded by ____ (Insert name of person taking him into custody, responsible relative, guardian, or conservator).

That property is now located at ____.Dated: ____ 19__.Signature and Title

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5212.

Whenever possible, persons charged with service of orders and apprehension of persons pursuant to this article shall dress in plain clothes and travel in unmarked vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 722.)
-------------------------------------------

5213.

(a) If, upon evaluation, the person is found to be in need of treatment because the person is, as a result of a mental health disorder, a danger to self or others, or is gravely disabled, the person may be detained for treatment in a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation. Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays may be excluded from the 72-hour period if the State Department of Social Services certifies for each facility that evaluation and treatment services may not reasonably be made available on those days. The certification by the department is subject to renewal every two years. The department shall adopt regulations defining criteria for determining whether a facility may reasonably be expected to make evaluation and treatment
 services available on Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

(b) Persons who have been detained for evaluation and treatment, who are receiving medications as a result of their mental illness, shall be given, as soon as possible after detention, written and oral information about the probable effects and possible side effects of the medication, by a person designated by the mental health facility where the person is detained. The State Department of Social Services shall develop and promulgate written materials on the effects of medications, for use by county mental health programs as disseminated or as modified by the county mental health program, addressing the probable effects and the possible side effects of the medication. The following information shall be given orally to the patient:

(1) The nature of the mental illness, or behavior, that is the reason the medication is being given or recommended.

(2) The likelihood of improving or not improving without the medications.

(3) Reasonable alternative treatments available.

(4) The name and type, frequency, amount, and method of dispensing the medications, and the probable length of time that the medications will be taken.

(c) The fact that the information has or has not been given shall be indicated in the patient’s chart. If the information has not been given, the designated person shall document in the patient’s chart the justification for not providing the information. A failure to give
 information about the probable effects and possible side effects of the medication does not constitute new grounds for release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 21.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Court-Ordered Evaluation for Persons Impaired by Chronic Alcoholism or Drug Use [5225. - 5230.]

5225.

Whenever a criminal defendant who appears, as a result of chronic alcoholism or the use of narcotics or restricted dangerous drugs, to be a danger to others, to himself, or to be gravely disabled, is brought before any judge, the judge may order the defendant’s evaluation under conditions set forth in this article, provided evaluation services designated in the county plan pursuant to Section 5654 are available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

5226.

Such a criminal defendant must be advised of his right to immediately continue with the criminal proceeding, and it is the duty of the judge to apprise the defendant fully of his option and of the consequences which will occur if the defendant chooses the evaluation procedures. The defendant shall have a right to legal counsel at the proceedings at which the choice is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5226.1.

If a judge issues an order for evaluation under conditions set forth in this article, proceedings on the criminal charge then pending in the court from which the order for evaluation issued shall be dismissed or suspended until such time as the evaluation of the defendant and the subsequent detention of the defendant for involuntary treatment, if any, are completed. Upon completion of such evaluation and detention, if any, the defendant shall, if such criminal charge has not been dismissed, be returned by the sheriff of the county in which the order of evaluation was made, from the evaluation or intensive treatment facility to the custody of the sheriff who shall return
 the defendant to the court where the order for evaluation was made, and proceedings on the criminal charge shall be resumed or dismissed. If, during evaluation or detention for involuntary treatment, the defendant is recommended for conservatorship, and if the criminal charge has not previously been dismissed, the defendant shall be returned by the sheriff to the court in which such charge is pending for the disposition of the criminal charge prior to the initiation of the conservatorship proceedings. The judge of such court may order such defendant to be detained in the evaluation or treatment facility until the day set for the resumption of the proceedings on the criminal charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 722.)
-------------------------------------------

5227.

The order for evaluation shall be in substantially the following form: In the Superior Court of the State of California
 for the County of _____The People of the State of California
 Concerning andRespondents

 No. _____
Order 
for 
EvaluationThe People of the State of California to :(Professional person in charge of the facility providing 
evaluation)______ has appeared before me and appears to be, as a result of ______ (chronic alcoholism, the use of narcotics, or the use of restricted dangerous drugs), a danger to himself, or others, or gravely disabled.Now, therefore, you are directed to evaluate ______ at ______ on the ____ day of ____, 19__, at __ o’clock _m.Witness my hand, this ____ day of ____, 19__.Judge of the ________ CourtReturn of OrderI hereby certify that I received the above order for the evaluation of ______ and on the ____ day of ____, 19__, personally served a copy of the order and of the petition on the professional person in charge of the ______, a facility for treatment and evaluation, or his designee.Dated: ____
 19__.Signature and Title

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1129.)
-------------------------------------------

5228.

As promptly as possible, a copy of the order for evaluation shall be personally served on the person to be evaluated and the professional person in charge of the facility for treatment and evaluation named in the order, or his designee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5229.

At the time a person is ordered to undergo evaluation, or within a reasonable time thereafter, unless a responsible relative or the guardian or conservator of the person is in possession of the person’s personal property, the person shall take reasonable precautions to preserve and safeguard the personal property in the possession of or on the premises occupied by the person. The person responsible for taking him to the evaluation facility shall then furnish to the court a report generally describing the person’s property so preserved and safeguarded and its disposition, in substantially the form set forth in Section 5211; except that if a responsible relative or the guardian
 or conservator of the person is in possession of the person’s property, the report shall include only the name of the relative or guardian or conservator and the location of the property, whereupon responsibility of the person responsible for taking him to the evaluation facility for such property shall terminate.

As used in this section, “responsible relative” includes the spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5230.
